Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 21
DOMESTIC WATER AND ICE

Sec.

§ 37-2101. Manufacture and storage of ice.

Ice manufactured or stored for human consumption shall be made from pure water, and shall be kept stored in clean places free from all filth, offal, refuse, and polluted waters and separate and removed from contact with animal or vegetable matter, and not in proximity to any cesspool, privy vault or sewer, nor in places where such ice may be subject to contamination from, or in the action of, acids, oils, noxious, offensive or injurious gases, smoke or vapors; and all ice manufactured or stored in violation of this section shall be deemed polluted ice and not fit for human consumption; and it shall be unlawful to sell, offer for sale, or store for sale such polluted ice, for human consumption.

§ 37-2102. Domestic water to be protected.

Any person or persons, corporation or corporations, or officers of a municipality, owning or maintaining any plant or public water system as defined in rules of the department, for the supply to the inhabitants of this state, or any part thereof, of water for domestic purposes shall protect the same and keep it free from all impurities and all other foreign substances which tend to injure the health of the ultimate consumers of such water, whether such impurities or foreign substances are chemical or bacterial. It shall be the duty of any of the persons or corporations owning or maintaining such a plant or public water system to provide notices to the radio and television station serving the area served by the public water system or by direct mail to those persons consuming such water of any acute violations from the standards established by the United States environmental protection agency as soon as possible but in no case later than seventy-two (72) hours. An acute health violation is defined as: (i) any violations specified by the state as posing an acute risk to human health; (ii) violation of the maximum contaminant level for nitrate or nitrite as established by federal regulation; (iii) violation of the maximum contaminant level for total coliforms, when fecal coliforms of E. coli are present in the water distribution system; or (iv) occurrence of a waterborne disease outbreak as defined by federal regulation. For purposes of this section, maximum contaminant level shall mean the maximum permissible level of a contaminant in water which is delivered to any user of a public water system.

§ 37-2103. Violation a misdemeanor.

Any person, persons, corporation, corporations or officers of a municipality, failing or neglecting to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.